Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4122.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 1105. (1) As used in this act: (a) Adulterated means food to which any of the following apply: (i) It bears or contains a poisonous or deleterious substance that may render the food injurious to health unless the substance is not an added substance and the quantity of that substance in the food does not ordinarily render it injurious to health. (ii) It bears or contains an added poisonous or added deleterious substance, other than a substance that is a pesticide chemical in or on a raw agricultural commodity, a food additive, or a color additive considered unsafe within the meaning of subsection (2). (iii) It is a raw agricultural commodity that bears or contains a pesticide chemical considered unsafe within the meaning of subsection (2). (iv) It bears or contains a food additive considered unsafe within the meaning of subsection (2). However, if a pesticide chemical is used in or on a raw agricultural commodity in conformity with an exemption granted or limitation prescribed under subsection (2) and the raw agricultural commodity is subjected to processing, the residue of that pesticide chemical remaining in or on that processed food is, notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) and this subdivision, not considered unsafe if that residue in or on the raw agricultural commodity is removed to the extent possible in good manufacturing practice and if the concentration of that residue in the processed food when ready to eat is not greater than the tolerance prescribed for the raw agricultural commodity. (v) It is or contains a new animal drug or conversion product of a new animal drug that is unsafe within the meaning of section 101 of the federal act, 21 USC 360b. (vi) It consists in whole or in part of a diseased, contaminated, filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance or it is otherwise unfit for food. (vii) It has been produced, prepared, packed, or held under unsanitary conditions in which it may have become contaminated with filth or in which it may have been rendered diseased, unwholesome, or injurious to health. (viii) It is the product of a diseased animal or animal that has died other than by slaughter or has been fed uncooked garbage or uncooked offal from a slaughterhouse. (ix) Its container is composed, in whole or in part, of a poisonous or deleterious substance that may render the contents injurious to health. (x) A valuable constituent is in whole or in part omitted or abstracted from the food; a substance is substituted wholly or in part for the food; damage or inferiority is concealed in any manner; or a substance is added to, mixed with, or packed with the food to increase its bulk or weight, reduce its quality or strength, or make it appear better or of greater value than it is. (xi) It is confectionery and has partially or completely imbedded in it a nonnutritive object except if, as provided by rules, the object is of practical functional value to the confectionery product and would not render the product injurious or hazardous to health; it is confectionery and bears or contains any alcohol other than alcohol not in excess of 0.5% by volume derived solely from the use of flavoring extracts; or it is confectionery and bears or contains a nonnutritive substance except a nonnutritive substance such as harmless coloring, harmless flavoring, harmless resinous glaze not in excess of 0.4%, harmless natural wax not in excess of 0.4%, harmless natural gum and pectin or any chewing gum by reason of its containing harmless nonnutritive masticatory substances which is in or on the confectionery by reason of its use for some practical functional purpose in the manufacture, packaging, or storage of the confectionery if the use of the substance does not promote deception of the consumer or otherwise result in adulteration or misbranding in violation of this act. For the purpose of avoiding or resolving uncertainty as to the application of this subdivision, the director may issue rules allowing or prohibiting the use of particular nonnutritive substances. (xii) It is, bears, or contains any color additive that is unsafe within the meaning of subsection (2). (xiii) It is intentionally subjected to radiation, unless the use of the radiation was in conformity with a rule or exemption under this act or a regulation or exemption under the federal act. (xiv) It is bottled water that contains a substance at a level higher than allowed under this act. (b) Advertisement means a representation disseminated in any manner or by any means, other than by labeling, for the purpose of inducing, or which is likely to induce, directly or indirectly, the purchase of food. (c) Agricultural use operation means a maple syrup production facility or similar food establishment that finishes a raw commodity and is integral to the agricultural production of, and is located at, a farm. An agricultural use operation is not considered a food processor or retail processing operation for purposes of personal or real property but must meet those same standards and licensing requirements under this act. (d) Bed and breakfast means a private residence that offers sleeping accommodations to transient tenants in 14 or fewer rooms for rent, is the innkeepers residence where the innkeeper resides while renting the rooms to transient tenants, and serves breakfasts, or other meals in the case of a bed and breakfast described in section 1107(t)(ii), at no extra cost to its transient tenants. A bed and breakfast is not a food service establishment if exempt under section 1107(t)(ii) or (iii). (e) Color additive means a dye, pigment, or other substance that is made by a process of synthesis or similar artifice or is extracted, isolated, or otherwise derived, with or without intermediate or final change of identity from a vegetable, animal, mineral, or other source, or when added or applied to a food or any part of a food is capable alone or through reaction with other substances of imparting color to the food. Color additive does not include any material that is exempt or hereafter is exempted under the federal act. This subdivision does not apply to a pesticide chemical, soil or plant nutrient, or other agricultural chemical solely because of its effect in aiding, retarding, or otherwise affecting, directly or indirectly, the growth of other natural physiological process of produce of the soil and thereby affecting its color, whether before or after harvest. Color includes black, white, and intermediate grays. (f) Consumer means an individual who is a member of the public that takes possession of food, does not function in the capacity of an operator of a food establishment or food processor, and does not offer the food for resale. (g) Contaminated with filth means contaminated as a result of not being securely protected from dust, dirt, and, as far as may be necessary by all reasonable means, from all foreign or injurious contaminants. (h) Continental breakfast means the serving of only non-potentially-hazardous food such as a roll, pastry or doughnut, fruit juice, or hot beverage, but may also include individual portions of milk and other items incidental to those foods. (i) Core item means a provision in the food code that is not designated as a priority item or a priority foundation item. Core item includes both of the following: (i) An item that usually relates to general sanitation, operational controls, sanitation standard operating procedures (SSOPs), facilities or structures, equipment design, or general maintenance. (ii) The requirements of sections 2129(2) and 6152(1). (j) Cottage food operation means a person who produces or packages cottage food products only in a kitchen of that persons primary domestic residence within this state. (k) Cottage food product means a food that is not a food that is time/temperature control for safety, as that term is defined in the food code. Cottage food product includes, but is not limited to, jams, jellies, dried fruit, candy, cereal, granola, dry mixes, vinegar, dried herbs, and baked goods that do not require temperature control for safety. Cottage food product does not include any of the following: (i) Any food regulated under 21 CFR parts 108, 113, and 114, including salsa. (ii) Canned low-acid fruits or acidified vegetables. (iii) Other canned foods except for standardized jams, jellies, and preserves as described in 21 CFR part 150. (iv) Meat and poultry products. (v) Milk products. (vi) Bottled water and other beverages. (vii) Home-produced ice products. (2) An added poisonous or deleterious substance, food additive, pesticide chemical in or on a raw agricultural commodity, or color additive is considered unsafe for the purpose of subsection (1)(a), unless there is in effect a federal regulation or exemption from regulation under the federal act, the federal meat inspection act, 21 USC 601 to 683, the poultry products inspection act, 21 USC 451 to 472, or another federal statute, or a rule limiting the quantity of the substance, and the use or intended use of the substance, and the use or intended use of the substance conforms to the terms prescribed by the federal regulation or exemption or rule. Sec. 1111. As used in this act: (a) Raw agricultural commodity means any food in its raw or natural state including fruits that are washed, colored, or otherwise treated in their unpeeled natural form before marketing. (b) Regulatory authority means the department, local health department, or authorized representative having jurisdiction over the food establishment. (c) Retail food establishment means an operation that sells or offers to sell food directly to a consumer. Retail food establishment includes both a retail grocery and a food service establishment, but does not include a food processor. (d) Retail grocery means an operation that sells or offers to sell food to consumers for off-premises consumption. Food for off-premises consumption does not include take-out food intended for immediate consumption. (e) Rules means administrative rules promulgated under this act in accordance with the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (f) Shellfish dealer means an interstate wholesaler handling shellfish. (g) Shellfish dealer certification means the issuance of a numbered certificate to a person that indicates that the person is in compliance with the requirements of the guide for the control of molluscan shellfish and has permission from the department to conduct 1 or more of the following shellfish activities, as defined in the guide for the control of molluscan shellfish: (i) Shellstock shipper. (ii) Shucker packer. (iii) Repacker or reshipper. (h) Smoked fish rules means R 285.569.1 to R 285.569.19 of the Michigan Administrative Code. (i) Special transitory food unit means a temporary food establishment that is licensed to operate throughout the state without the 14-day limits or a mobile food establishment that is not required to return to a commissary. (j) Staple foods does not include accessory foods such as coffee, tea, cocoa, soda, noncarbonated drinks such as sports drinks, punches, and flavored waters, candy, condiments, spices, hot foods, or foods ready to go or made to take out, such as prepared sandwiches or salads. (k) Sulfiting agents means any of the following: (i) Sulfur dioxide. (ii) Sodium sulfite. (iii) Sodium bisulfite. (iv) Potassium bisulfite. (v) Sodium metabisulfite. (vi) Potassium metabisulfite. (l) Temporary food establishment means a food establishment that operates at a fixed location for a temporary period not to exceed 14 consecutive days. (m) Temporary license means a written authorization issued by the director to operate for a specified limited time period. (n) Third-party food delivery platform means a business engaged in the service of delivery from a cottage food operation or online food ordering and delivery from a food service establishment to a consumer. (o) Transient tenant means an individual who rents a room in a bed and breakfast for fewer than 30 consecutive days. (p) Trimming means removing leaves, roots, and other extraneous materials in preparation for grading, sorting, and sale as a whole fruit or vegetable. Trimming does not remove the peel or core and does not further cut the whole fruit or vegetable. (q) U.S. standards for shell eggs means United States Standards, Grades, and Weight Classes for Shell Eggs, AMS 56 (July 20, 2000), United States Department of Agriculture. (r) Vending company base location means a vending machine location or other food establishment required to be separately licensed under section 4105(5). (s) Vending machine means a self-service device that, after inserting a coin, paper currency, token, card, or key, or by manual operation, dispenses a unit serving of food in bulk or in a package without the necessity of replenishing the device between each vending operation. Vending machine does not include any of the following: (i) A device that dispenses only bottled or canned soft drinks, other packaged nonperishable foods or beverages, or bulk ball gum, nuts, or panned candies. (ii) A water dispensing machine that is registered under section 4115. (t) Vending machine location means the room, enclosure, space, or area in which 1 or more vending machines are installed and operated, or a micro market. (u) Wholesale means selling other than directly to consumers. (v) Wild game means animals from their natural state and not cultivated, domesticated, or tamed. Sec. 4102. (1) A cottage food operation is exempt from the licensing and evaluation provisions of this act. This exemption does not include an exemption from the adulteration and other standards imposed in this section or under this act, or both, and does not limit the ability of the department to take appropriate enforcement action for applicable violations as described in section 5101. This subsection does not require a cottage food operation to meet the standards contained in 21 CFR part 110 or the food code. (2) Cottage food products must be prepackaged and properly labeled before sale. (3) A cottage food operation shall place on the label of any food it produces or packages the following information: (a) One of the following, as applicable: (i) The name and address of the business of the cottage food operation. (ii) The name, telephone number, and registration number issued under subsection (8) of the business of the cottage food operation. (b) The name of the cottage food product. (c) The ingredients of the cottage food product, in descending order of predominance by weight. (d) The net weight or net volume of the cottage food product. (e) Allergen labeling as specified by federal labeling requirements. (f) If any nutritional claim is made, appropriate labeling as specified by federal labeling requirements. (g) The following statement printed in at least the equivalent of 11-point font size in a color that provides a clear contrast to the background: Made in a home kitchen that has not been inspected by the Michigan department of agriculture and rural development.. (4) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a cottage food product must be sold directly from the cottage food operation to the consumer. Sales by consignment or at wholesale are prohibited. A cottage food product may be sold by internet or mail order or may be delivered to a consumer through a third-party food delivery platform if the cottage food operation provides an opportunity for a consumer to directly interact with the cottage food operation before the cottage food product is sold. A cottage food product sold by internet or mail order or delivered through a third-party delivery platform must be sold or delivered only to a consumer in this state. As used in this subsection: (a) Directly interact with includes either a face-to-face meeting or a virtual meeting. (b) Virtual meeting includes, but is not limited to, a meeting in which communication occurs electronically in a manner that permits 2-way communication so that participants can see or be seen and hear or be heard by all parties to the communication. (5) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the gross sales of cottage food products by a cottage food operation must not exceed $50,000.00 annually until October 1,2026. If the cottage food operation sells cottage food products at a price of $250.00 or more per unit, the gross sales of the cottage food products by the cottage food operation must not exceed $75,000.00 annually until October 1, 2026. For the purposes of this subsection, gross sales must be computed on the basis of the amount of gross sales on a per-person basis within or at a particular domestic residence. The department may request in writing documentation to verify the annual gross sales figure. Beginning October 1, 2026, and by each October 1 thereafter, the department may adjust the gross sales amounts set under this subsection by the amount calculated by multiplying the sales limit in effect during the immediately preceding fiscal year by the inflation adjustment factor and rounding to the nearest whole dollar. The inflation adjustment factor used under this subsection is equal to the 3-year average July-June Consumer Price Index for the current fiscal year divided by the 3-year average July-June Consumer Price Index for the immediately preceding fiscal year, as determined by the department of treasury using the Detroit Consumer Price Index. An inflation adjustment factor used under this subsection must not be less than $1.00. As used in this subsection, Detroit Consumer Price Index means the most comprehensive index of consumer prices available for the Detroit-Warren-Dearborn area from the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor. (6) Cottage food products must be stored only in the primary domestic residence. (7) An exemption under this section does not affect the application of any other state or federal laws or any applicable ordinances enacted by any local unit of government. (8) If the MSU Product Center administers a registration program for cottage food operations, the records of which must be available to the department on request, a cottage food operation may register with the MSU Product Center. The MSU Product Center may do both of the following: (a) Issue a document that evidences the granting of registration and contains an identifying number unique to a cottage food operation. (b) Collect a 1-time registration fee of not more than $50.00 to administer the registration program. (9) A cottage food operation that registers with the MSU Product Center under subsection (8) shall include on the label described under subsection (3) the registration number issued to the cottage food operation. A cottage food operation that does not register with the MSU Product Center under subsection (8) shall include on the label described in subsection (3) the name and address of the cottage food operation. (10) Information obtained under subsection (8) is exempt from disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor